Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 17 Forgery and Counterfeiting

11-17-1.
Forgery and counterfeiting in general.

Every person who shall falsely make, alter, forge, or counterfeit, or procure to be falsely made, altered, forged, or counterfeited, any public record, or any writ, process, or proceeding in any court of justice in this state, any certificate or attestation of any judge, justice of the peace, warden, notary public, clerk of any court, town clerk, city clerk or other public officer, in any matter in which the certificate or attestation may be received as legal proof, any charter, deed, will, testament, bond, or writing obligatory, letter of attorney, policy of insurance, bill of exchange, bill of lading, railroad ticket, promissory note, order, acquittance, discharge for or upon the payment of money or delivery of goods, or any acceptance of a bill of exchange or any indorsement, assignment, or guaranty of any bill of exchange or promissory note, or any certificate, or accountable receipt for money, goods, or any other thing, or any warrant, order, or request for the payment of money or delivery of goods, or for the delivery of any note, bill, or other security for money or goods, or any lottery ticket, or part or share of any lottery ticket in any lottery authorized by the laws of any state, territory, or country, or any writing whatsoever purporting to contain evidence of any debt, contract, or promise, or of the discharge, payment of satisfaction of any debt, contract, or promise, with intent to defraud, or who shall utter and publish as true or shall procure to be uttered and published as true any such false, forged, altered, or counterfeited record, deed, or other writing as provided in this section, knowing it to be false, forged, altered, or counterfeited, with intent to defraud, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 280, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 398, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 609, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-17-1

.

11-17-1.1.
Forgery — Public assistance check or authorization.

Any person who shall knowingly forge or cause to be forged one or more public assistance benefit check or authorization issued pursuant to chapter 6 of title 40, when the total value of the check or authorization so forged or caused to be forged in any period of twelve (12) consecutive months exceeds five hundred dollars ($500), shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

Any person who shall knowingly forge or cause to be forged any public assistance benefit check or authorization issued pursuant to chapter 6 of title 40, when the value of the check or authorization forged or caused to be forged shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500), shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

All criminal actions for any violation of this section shall be prosecuted by the attorney general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 234, § 1.

11-17-1.2.
Forgery and counterfeiting of registration plates.

Every person who shall forge, counterfeit, or cause to be forged or counterfeited, any registration plate or special use identification tag, or knowingly possess any forged or counterfeited registration plate or special use identification tag, as provided in §

31-3-40

, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 180, § 1.

11-17-2.
Forgery, counterfeiting, or alteration of state debt certificate or bank bill or note.

Every person who shall falsely make, forge, counterfeit, or falsely alter any note, certificate, or other security, in imitation of and purporting to be a note, certificate, or other security, which has been or hereafter may be issued for any debt of this state, or any bank bill or note in imitation of or purporting to be a bank bill which has been or hereafter may be issued by any corporation which is or hereafter may be established as a bank, in this state or elsewhere, shall be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) years nor less than two (2) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 280, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 346, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 398, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 609, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-17-2

.

11-17-3.
Passing of counterfeit certificates, bills, or notes.

Every person who shall utter, publish, pass, or tender in payment as true, any false, forged, counterfeited, or altered certificate, security or bank bill or note, knowing it to be false, forged, counterfeited, or altered, with intent to defraud, shall be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) years nor less than two (2) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 280, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 346, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 398, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 609, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

11-17-3

.

11-17-4.
Importation or possession of counterfeit certificate, bill, or note.

Every person who shall bring into this state or have in his or her possession or custody within this state, any false, forged, counterfeited, or altered certificate or security, bank bill, or note, knowing it to be false, forged, counterfeited or altered, with intent to utter, pass or, tender it in payment the same as true, shall be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) years nor less than two (2) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 280, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 346, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 398, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 609, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

11-17-4

.

11-17-5.
Manufacture, repair, or possession of counterfeiting devices.

Every person who shall engrave, form, make, or mend, or begin to engrave, form, make, or mend any plate, stone, paper, rolling press, or other instrument or material devised, adapted, and designed for the stamping, forging, or making any false, forged, and counterfeited bank bill or note, in imitation of bank bills or notes which have been or shall be issued by any bank which is or hereafter may be established as a bank in this state or elsewhere, or shall have in his or her possession or custody any plate or stone engraved in any part, or any paper, rolling press, or other instrument or material devised, adapted, or designed as provided in this section, with intent to use and employ it or to cause or permit it to be used and employed in making any false and counterfeited bank bill or note, shall be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) years nor less than two (2) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 280, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 346, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 398, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 609, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

11-17-5

.

11-17-6.
Evidence as to handwriting.

In no prosecutions for forging, counterfeiting, or altering any bank bill or note or for uttering, passing, or tendering in payment as true any false, forged, counterfeited, or altered bank bill or note, or for bringing into this state or for having in possession or custody any false, forged, counterfeited, or altered bank bill or note with intent to pass it as true, knowing it to be false, forged, counterfeited, or altered, shall the testimony of any person whose name is purported to be signed to the bill or note or his or her personal attendance as a witness be requisite, when he or she shall be absent from this state at the time of the trial or when his or her place of residence shall be outside the limits of this state or more than thirty (30) miles from the place of trial, but the testimony of any competent witness who is acquainted with the handwriting of the person or who has knowledge of the difference between true and counterfeit or altered bank bills and who is skilled in the difference shall be received as competent evidence to prove any bank bill or note to be false, forged, counterfeited, or altered.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 280, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 346, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 398, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 609, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

11-17-6

.

11-17-7.
Forgery or counterfeiting of coins.

Every person who shall forge or counterfeit any coin in imitation or similitude of any gold or silver coin current within this state by law or usage shall be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) years nor less than two (2) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 280, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 346, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 398, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 609, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

11-17-7

.

11-17-8.
Passing of counterfeit coins.

Every person who shall utter or tender in payment as true any false, forged or counterfeit coin, made and forged in imitation and similitude of any gold or silver coin current within this state by law or usage, knowing it to be false or counterfeit, with intent to defraud, shall be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) years nor less than two (2) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 280, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 346, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 398, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 609, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

11-17-8

.

11-17-9.
Importation or possession of counterfeit coin with intent to pass.

Every person who shall bring into this state or have in his or her possession or custody any false or counterfeit coin, made and forged in imitation and similitude of any gold or silver coin current within this state by law or usage, knowing it to be false or counterfeit, with intent to utter or pass it in payment as true, shall be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) years nor less than two (2) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 280, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 346, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 398, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 609, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

11-17-9

.

11-17-10.
Manufacture, repair, or possession of device for counterfeit of coins.

Every person who shall cast, stamp, engrave, form, make, or mend or begin to cast, stamp, engrave, form, make, or mend, or have in his or her possession or custody any mould, pattern, die, punch, press, or other tool or instrument whatsoever, devised, adapted, and designed for the forging or making any false or counterfeit coin in imitation and similitude of any gold or silver coin current within this state by law or usage, with intent to use and employ it or to cause it to be used or employed in forging or making any false or counterfeit coin as provided in this section, shall be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) years nor less than two (2) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 280, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 346, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 398, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 609, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

11-17-10

.

11-17-11.
Seizure and destruction of counterfeits and counterfeiting devices.

Whenever the existence of any false, forged, or counterfeit bank bills or notes, or any plates, dies, or other tools, instruments, or implements used by counterfeiters or designed for the forging or making of any false or counterfeit notes, coin, or bills, shall come to the knowledge of any deputy sheriff, town constable, or police officer in this state, the officers shall immediately seize and take possession of it and deliver it into the custody of the superior court for the county in which it shall be, and the court shall, as soon as the ends of justice will permit, cause it to be destroyed by an officer of the court, which officer shall make a return to the court of his or her doings in the premises.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 280, § 11; C.P.A. 1905, § 1222; G.L. 1909, ch. 346, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 398, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 609, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

11-17-11

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 33; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 14; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 14.

11-17-12.
Disposition of plates and dies of defunct banks.

Whenever the charter of any bank in this state shall expire or become forfeited, and whenever any bank in this state shall close its business for any cause whatsoever, the directors of the bank who shall have been last in office shall immediately deliver up all their plates and dies to the superior court for the county in which the bank shall have been located or established, and the court shall cause the plates and dies to be disposed of in any manner that the court shall deem expedient, in order to prevent their being afterwards used for any unlawful purpose. Every director who shall willfully neglect or refuse to comply with the requirements of this section shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 280, §§ 12, 13; C.P.A. 1905, § 1222; G.L. 1909, ch. 346, §§ 12, 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 398, §§ 12, 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 609, §§ 12, 13; G.L. 1956, §

11-17-12

.

11-17-13.
Forgery, counterfeiting, or alteration of trademark, service mark, or identification mark.

As used in this chapter, “forged” or “counterfeited trademark”, “service mark”, or “identification mark” means any mark or design which is: (1) identical to, substantially indistinguishable from, or an imitation of a trademark, service mark, or identification mark which is registered for those types of goods or services with the secretary of state pursuant to chapter 2 of title 6 or registered on the principal register of the United States Patent and Trademark Office or registered under the laws of any other state or protected by the Federal Amateur Sports Act of 1978, Title 36 USC § 380, or if a registered or unregistered use of the trademark or design or data plate, serial number, or part identification number; and (2) which has not been authorized by the owner of it and is done for pecuniary gain and with the intent to defraud the holder of the trademark, service mark, or identification mark.

Any person who knowingly and willfully forges or counterfeits any trademark, service mark, or identification mark, without the consent of the owner of the trademark, service mark or identification mark, or who knowingly possesses any tool, machine device, or other reproduction instrument or material with the intent to reproduce any forged or counterfeited trademark, service mark, or identification mark, shall be guilty of the offense of trademark counterfeiting.

Any person who knowingly and willfully sells, offer to sell, or possesses with the intent to sell goods which contain a counterfeit trademark, service mark, or identification mark or sells or offers for sale a service in conjunction with a service mark the person knows is counterfeit, shall be guilty of the offense of trafficking in trademark counterfeits.

If the goods or service to which the forged or counterfeit trademarks, service marks, or identification marks are attached or affixed, or in connection with which they are used, or to which the offender intended they be attached or affixed, or in connection with which the offender intended they be used, have, in the aggregate, a retail value of the goods if they were not forged or counterfeited of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more, the person shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction may be imprisoned up to five (5) years and fined up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

If the goods or service to which the forged or counterfeit trademarks, service marks, or registered designs are attached or affixed, or in connection with which they are used, or to which the offender intended they be attached or affixed, or in connection with which the offender intended they be used, have, in the aggregate, a retail value of the goods if they were not forged or counterfeited of less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), the person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and may be imprisoned up to one year and fined up to one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Any person who knowingly: (i) uses an object, tool, machine, or other device to produce or reproduce a counterfeit mark, or (ii) has possession, custody, or control of any object, tool, machine, or device with intent to produce or reproduce a counterfeit mark, is guilty of a felony and may be imprisoned up to five (5) years and fined up to five thousand dollars ($5,000).

The possession, custody, or control of more than twenty-five (25) items having a counterfeit mark used on or in connection with them creates a presumption that the person having possession, custody, or control of the items intended to sell those items.

If a person who violates this section previously has been convicted of violating this section, the person shall be guilty of a felony and may be imprisoned up to five (5) years and fined up to five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Any personal property, including any item, object, tool, machine, device, or vehicle of any kind, employed as an instrumentality in the commission of, or in aiding or abetting in the commission of a violation of this section, or proceeds derived directly from a violation of this section, is subject to seizure and forfeiture and further proceedings shall be had for their forfeiture as is prescribed by law in chapter 21 of title 12; provided, that no property used by any person shall be forfeited under the provisions of this section unless it shall appear that the owner of the property had knowledge, actual or constructive, and was a consenting party to the illegal act.

Property taken or detained under this section shall not be repleviable, but shall be deemed to be in the custody of the law enforcement agency making the seizure and whenever property is forfeited under this chapter it shall be utilized as follows:

Where the seized property is a vessel, vehicle, aircraft, or other personal property, it may be retained and used by the law enforcement agency that seized that property where the use of the property is reasonably related to the law enforcement duties of the seizing agency. If the seized property is a motor vehicle which is inappropriate for use by the law enforcement agency due to style, size or color, the seizing agency shall be allowed to apply the proceeds of sale or the trade-in value of the vehicle for activities reasonably related to law enforcement duties.

Eighty percent (80%) of the proceeds shall be divided among the state and local law enforcement agencies proportionately based upon their contribution to the investigation of the criminal activity related to the asset being forfeited; the balance shall go to the department of attorney general for purposes related to law enforcement.

At the conclusion of any criminal matter brought under this chapter any property seized pursuant to this chapter containing a counterfeit trademark, service mark, copyrighted or registered design shall be destroyed unless the owner of the trademark, service mark, or identification mark gives prior written consent to the use or sale of the property and the trademark, service mark, or identification mark is obliterated or removed from the property prior to the disposition of it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 53, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 100, § 1.